Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 33.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201283-1222
Hearing; rights
of parties; hearing officer; production of evidence.

Any
party at a hearing conducted pursuant to section 83-1219 shall have the right
to:

(1) Be accompanied and advised by counsel and by individuals
with special knowledge or training with respect to the needs of persons with
developmental disabilities;

(2) Present evidence and confront, cross-examine, and compel
the attendance of witnesses;

(3) Prohibit the introduction of any evidence at the hearing
that has not been disclosed to that party at least five days before the hearing;

(4) Obtain a written or electronic verbatim record of the
hearing; and

(5) Obtain written findings of fact and decisions from the director.

The hearing officer may also produce evidence on his or her
own motion.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 22;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 33.